Washington statutes.
RCW 36.77.075

County roads—Small works roster.

In lieu of the procedure for awarding contracts that is provided in RCW 36.77.020 through 36.77.040, a county may award contracts for public works projects on county roads using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.151 through 39.04.154.

[ 2023 c 395 s 26; 2000 c 138 s 208; 1991 c 363 s 81.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 395 ss 1-30, 32-34, 36, and 37: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Findings—Intent—2023 c 395: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Purpose—Part headings not law—2000 c 138: See notes following RCW 39.04.010.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.